el: Υλικό κεντρικού μπλοκ bongo: Σύνθετο υλικό; Μέταλλο; Ξύλο; Άλλο
sl-SI: Material sredinskega bloka za bongo bobne: Kompozit; Kovina; Les; Drugo
bg-BG: Материал на централния блок на бонгото: Композитен материал; Метал; Дърво; Друго
lt-LT: Bongo centrinio bloko medžiaga: Kompozitinė; Metalinė; Medinė; Kita
sv: Bongons mittblocksmaterial: Komposit; Metall; Trä; Annat
th: วัสดุที่ใช้ทำเซ็นเตอร์บล็อกของกลองบองโก้: คอมโพสิต; โลหะ; ไม้; อื่นๆ
fi: Bongorumpujen keskiosan materiaali: Komposiitti; Metalli; Puu; Muu
nb: Bongo senterblokkmateriale: Kompositt; Metall; Tre; Annet
nl: Bongo middenblok materiaal: Composiet; Metaal; Hout; Overige
zh-TW: 邦哥鼓中心塊材質: 複合材質; 金屬; 木材; 其他
hu: Bongó középső összekötőelemének anyaga: Kompozit; Fém; Fa; Egyéb
en: Bongo center block material: Composite; Metal; Wood; Other
sk-SK: Materiál stredového bloku bongo: Kompozit; Kov; Drevo; Iné
fr: Matériau du bloc central des bongos: Composite; Métal; Bois; Autre
pl: Materiał bloku centralnego bongosów: Kompozyt; Metal; Drewno; Inne
ko: 봉고 센터 블록 재질: 복합 소재; 금속; 목재; 기타
it: Materiale del blocco centrale Bongo: Composito; Metallo; Legno; Altro
de: Material des Bongo-Mittelblocks: Verbundmaterial; Metall; Holz; Sonstige
pt-PT: Material do bloco central do bongo: Composto; Metal; Madeira; Outro
cs: Materiál středového bloku bubnů bongo: Kompozit; Kov; Dřevo; Jiné
ro-RO: Materialul blocului central al bongoului: Compozit; Metal; Lemn; Altele
zh-CN: 邦戈鼓中心块材质: 复合材料; 金属; 木质; 其他
vi: Chất liệu khối trung tâm Bongo: Composite; Kim loại; Gỗ; Khác
tr: Bongo orta blok malzemesi: Kompozit; Metal; Ahşap; Diğer
pt-BR: Material do bloco central do bongô: Composto; Metal; Madeira; Outros
hr-HR: Materijal središnjeg bloka bonga: Kompozit; Metal; Drvo; Ostalo
da: Materiale i bongos centerblok: Komposit; Metal; Træ; Andet
es: Material del bloque central de los bongós: Compuesto; Metal; Madera; Otro
ja: ボンゴセンターブロック素材: コンポジット; 金属; 木材; その他
ru: Материал центрального блока бонго: Композит; Металл; Дерево; Другое